Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 72.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-172
Action on plan of merger by constituent
limited liability company.

(ULLCA
1003) (a) Subject to section 21-183, a plan of merger must be consented to
by all the members of a constituent limited liability company.

(b) Subject to section
21-183 and any contractual rights, after a merger is approved, and at any
time before articles of merger are delivered to the Secretary of State for
filing under section 21-173, a constituent limited liability company may amend
the plan or abandon the merger:

(1) as provided in the plan; or

(2) except as otherwise
prohibited in the plan, with the same consent as was required to approve the
plan.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 72.